Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that quantum technology has the potential to revolutionize traditional industries, with implications for society in terms of health care, climate change, energy, and security. Quantum technologies use the properties identified by quantum physics to provide new capabilities in a variety of applications, including computing, networking, communications, and sensing.The legislature further finds that the quantum technology industry is expected to create trillions of dollars of value over the next decade, and that policymakers worldwide are investing in quantum technology to ensure their participation in a future quantum economy. As economic competition grows and businesses choose locations based on each state's investment, Washington has limited time to leverage its technological and scientific assets to lead the next generation and drive new economic growth in the quantum technology industry.The legislature further finds that in 2024 and 2025, California invested $4,000,000 in quantum research and innovation, Colorado has received $40,500,000 in federal grants and over $1,000,000,000 in private funding to build a quantum ecosystem, Illinois allocated $500,000,000 to build a national quantum hub and infrastructure to attract quantum companies, and North Carolina has received $10,000,000 to research hybrid quantum computing processors.Therefore, to promote economic development and the next generation workforce, the legislature finds that the development of a state quantum strategy is necessary to ensure Washington remains competitive in the quantum technology industry. A state strategy should identify how state funds can promote economic growth, identify opportunities for public-private partnerships, and require private donations to be used to obtain additional grants and develop partnerships to accelerate the state's quantum technology industry.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) The department of commerce shall develop a state quantum technology strategy.(2) The state quantum technology strategy must include, but is not limited to:(a) An overview of the current state of the quantum technology industry, its projected growth over the next decade, and specific strategies that would lead to increased jobs and capital investments in the state;(b) Identification of projects and programs that will most quickly improve the economic vitality of the quantum technology industry;(c) Identification of the types of public-private partnerships involving government, academia, private investors, and a regional organization of companies, universities, national labs, and business organizations that will provide critical funding and partnerships to accelerate the quantum technology industry;(d) Analysis of state policies that will provide opportunities to grow the quantum technology industry, including consideration of regulatory reforms, tax and financial supports, and education and workforce programs;(e) Exploration of quantum application research in specific industry areas, such as nuclear physics, energy and renewables, materials science, and chemistry;(f) Identification of research and development opportunities with Washington-based research institutions including public universities, a regional organization of companies, universities, national labs, and business organizations, and the Pacific Northwest national laboratory;(g) Partnerships with industry and a regional organization of companies, universities, national labs, and business organizations to develop plans to attract federal investment; and(h) Identification of the anticipated impacts of a robust quantum technology industry in the state, including overall economic opportunities and workforce development.(3) The department of commerce may contract with a Washington state-based quantum technology business or a regional organization of companies, universities, national labs, and business organizations to assist with the obligations under this section.(4) Consistent with the department of commerce's authority under RCW 43.330.040, the department of commerce shall seek gifts, grants, and other contributions from nonstate sources to carry out the purposes of this section.(5) The department of commerce shall submit the state quantum technology strategy to the legislature by June 30, 2027, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.(6) This section expires August 1, 2027.--- END ---